District of Columbia statutes.
47-1432

Presumptions and burden of proof.

For the purpose of proper administration of this subchapter and to prevent evasion of the recordation requirements, the Mayor shall presume that all transfers, as described in § 47-1431, are required to be recorded. The burden shall be upon the person required to record to prove that a deed or any other document is exempt from the recordation requirement.

History

July 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-91, § 302, 24 DCR 9765
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1432.
1973 Ed., § 47-3314.